Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1802.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [97C.326] LEAD TACKLE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "jig" means a weighted hook. Jig does not include lead fishing-related items, including but not limited to fishing line, flies, lures, or spoons; and new text end new text begin (2) "sinker" means a device that is designed to be attached to a fishing line and intended to sink the line. Sinker does not include artificial lures, weighted line, weighted flies, or jig heads. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin A person may not use a sinker or jig to take fish if the sinker or jig contains lead and: new text end new text begin (1) weighs one ounce or less; or new text end new text begin (2) measures 2-1/2 inches or less in length. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [325E.3895] LEAD TACKLE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "jig" means a weighted hook. Jig does not include lead fishing-related items, including but not limited to fishing line, flies, lures, or spoons; and new text end new text begin (2) "sinker" means a device that is designed to be attached to a fishing line and intended to sink the line. Sinker does not include artificial lures, weighted line, weighted flies, or jig heads. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Manufacture prohibited. new text end new text begin A person may not manufacture for sale in Minnesota a sinker or jig that contains lead and: new text end new text begin (1) weighs one ounce or less; or new text end new text begin (2) measures 2-1/2 inches or less in length. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Sale prohibited. new text end new text begin A person may not offer for sale or sell any sinker or jig if it contains lead and: new text end new text begin (1) weighs one ounce or less; or new text end new text begin (2) measures 2-1/2 inches or less in length. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027. new text end